Nebraska, session 109, LB457.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall in
consultation with the State Department of Education develop model anaphylaxis
policies available for use in school districts and licensed child care programs
setting forth guidelines and procedures to be followed for the prevention of
anaphylaxis and during a medical emergency resulting from anaphylaxis. Such
policies may be developed with input from representatives of allergy medicine,
pediatric physicians, school nurses and other health care providers with
expertise in treating children with anaphylaxis, parents of children with
severe allergies, school administrators, teachers, school food service
directors, and other appropriate entities.
(2) Such policies shall include as applicable:
(a) A procedure and treatment plan, including emergency protocols and
responsibilities for staff members of licensed child care programs, school
nurses, and other appropriate school personnel, for responding to anaphylaxis;
(b) A procedure and appropriate guidelines for the development and
implementation of an individualized health care plan for children with a food
or other allergy which could result in anaphylaxis;
(c) A communication plan for the intake and dissemination of information
provided by the state regarding children with a food or other allergy which
could result in anaphylaxis, including a discussion of methods, treatments, and
therapies to reduce the risk of allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis;
(d) Strategies for the reduction of the risk of exposure to anaphylactic
causative agents, including food and other allergens; and
(e) A communication plan for discussion with children that have developed
adequate verbal communication and comprehension skills and with the parents,
guardians, and educational decisionmakers of all children attending the school
district or licensed child care program about foods that are safe and unsafe
and about strategies to avoid exposure to unsafe food.
(3) The policies developed pursuant to this section shall be reexamined
and updated as needed at least once every three years to be consistent with
best practices relating to anaphylaxis prevention, treatment, and emergency
response methods.
(4) A model policy developed or updated pursuant to this section shall be
made available on the applicable department's website.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) Licensed child care program means a facility or program licensed under
the Child Care Licensing Act; and
(b) School district has the same meaning as in section 79-101.
Sec. 2. Section 71-1908, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-1908 (1) Sections 71-1908 to 71-1923.03 and section 3 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Child Care Licensing Act.
(2) The Legislature finds that there is a present and growing need for
quality child care programs and facilities. There is a need to establish and
maintain licensure of persons providing such programs to ensure that such
persons are competent and are using safe and adequate facilities. The
Legislature further finds and declares that the development and supervision of
programs are a matter of statewide concern and should be dealt with uniformly
on the state and local levels. There is a need for cooperation among the
various state and local agencies which impose standards on licensees, and there
should be one agency which coordinates the enforcement of such standards and
informs the Legislature about cooperation among the various agencies.
Sec. 3. (1) Beginning July 1, 2026, a program licensed pursuant to the
Child Care Licensing Act without a policy in effect at such time, that cares
for a child with a known food or other allergy, shall adopt a specific policy
to address incidents of anaphylaxis involving children at the program. The
adopted policy may use the model policy for use in licensed child care programs
developed pursuant to section 1 of this act as a guide.
(2) A program licensed pursuant to the Child Care Licensing Act that cares
-1-

LB457 LB457
2025 2025
for a child with a known food or other allergy shall publish such program's
anaphylaxis policy in the parent handbook, program manual, or other similar
publication of the program which sets forth the procedures and standards of the
program.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to change the personal
rights, liabilities, and immunities granted pursuant to section 25-21,280 of
certain individuals responding to or treating life-threatening asthma or a
systemic allergic reaction.
Sec. 4. (1) The Legislature finds and declares that all students with
anaphylaxis have a right to work and study in a safe environment and that it is
an obligation of schools to address the needs of students with anaphylaxis.
(2) On or before July 1, 2026, the school board of each school district
shall adopt a written policy to address incidents of anaphylaxis involving
students at school. A school board may use the model policy for use in school
districts developed pursuant to section 1 of this act as a guide. Such policy
shall not conflict with or hinder the implementation of an individualized
anaphylaxis plan of a student and shall be consistent with section 79-224
relating to self-management by a student.
(3) A school district shall publish the policy in any school district
handbook, manual, or similar publication that sets forth the comprehensive
rules, procedures, and standards of conduct for students at school.
(4) A school district with a policy to address incidents of anaphylaxis
involving students at school that is in effect prior to the effective date of
this act may remain in effect and shall satisfy the requirements of subsection
(2) of this section.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to change the personal
rights, liabilities, and immunities granted pursuant to section 25-21,280 of
certain individuals responding to or treating life-threatening asthma or a
systemic allergic reaction.
Sec. 5. (1)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection,
beginning January 1, 2026, and notwithstanding section 44-3,131, (i) any
individual or group sickness and accident insurance policy or subscriber
contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any
hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for policies
that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited-benefit
coverage, and (ii) any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not
preempted by federal law, which provides coverage for medically necessary
epinephrine injectors shall limit the total amount that a covered individual is
required to pay for a two-pack of medically necessary epinephrine injectors at
an amount not to exceed sixty dollars, regardless of the type of epinephrine
injector.
(b) If the requirement described in subdivision (a) of this subsection
would result in the ineligibility of a health savings account under section 223
of the Internal Revenue Code, such requirement for such health savings account
shall only apply after the enrollee has satisfied the minimum deductible under
section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that for items or services
that are preventive care pursuant to section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal
Revenue Code, such requirement shall apply regardless of whether the minimum
deductible under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code has been satisfied.
(2) Nothing in this section prevents a policy, contract, or plan from
reducing the total amount that a covered individual is required to pay for each
covered medically necessary epinephrine injector to an amount less than the
maximum specified in subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 6. Original section 71-1908, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
-2-